Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB543.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2806.1(e)(2) of Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and subsection (m) is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 2806.1. Energy efficiency and conservation program.* * *(e) Commission approval.--* * *(2) The commission shall approve or disapprove a plan filed under subsection (b) within 120 days of submission. The following shall apply to an order disapproving a plan:(i) The commission shall describe in detail the 1234567891011121314151617 reasons for the disapproval.(ii) The electric distribution company shall have 60 days to file a revised plan to address the deficiencies identified by the commission. The revised plan shall be approved or disapproved by the commission within 60 days.(iii) The commission may not disapprove a plan solely due to the inclusion of mechanical insulation which is demonstrated to be cost effective using a total resource cost test approved by the commission.* * *(m) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection:* * *"Mechanical insulation." Insulation materials, facings and accessory products used for thermal requirements for mechanical piping and equipment, hot and cold applications and heating, venting and air conditioning applications.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0543PN0539 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920